Nebraska, session 109, LB130.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB130 LB130
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-4602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4602 (1) Within fifteen days after the end of each month, the Tax
Commissioner shall provide a public statement of actual General Fund net
receipts, a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
estimated net receipts from the most recent forecast provided by the
Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board pursuant to section
77-27,158, and a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
actual net receipts for the same month of the previous fiscal year.
(2) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
public statement shall also include (a) a summary of actual General Fund
net receipts and estimated General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year
as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603 and (b) a
comparison of the actual General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year to
the actual General Fund net receipts for the previous fiscal year.
(3)(a) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
Tax Commissioner shall determine the following:
(i) Actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently completed
fiscal year minus estimated General Fund net receipts for such fiscal
year as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the product of actual General Fund net
receipts for the most recently completed fiscal year times the difference
between the annual percentage increase in the actual General Fund net
receipts for the most recently completed fiscal year and the average
annual percentage increase in the actual General Fund net receipts over
the twenty previous fiscal years, excluding the year in which the annual
percentage change in actual General Fund net receipts is the lowest.
(b) If the number determined under subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this
section is a positive number, the Tax Commissioner shall immediately
certify the greater of the two numbers determined under subdivision (3)
(a) of this section to the Director of Administrative Services. The State
-2-

LB130 LB130
2025 2025
Treasurer shall transfer the certified amount from the General Fund to
the Cash Reserve Fund upon certification by the director of such amount.
The transfer shall be made according to the following schedule:
(i) An amount equal to the amount determined under subdivision (3)
(a)(i) of this section shall be transferred immediately; and
(ii) The remainder, if any, shall be transferred by the end of the
subsequent fiscal year.
(c) If the transfer required under subdivision (3)(b) of this
section causes the balance in the Cash Reserve Fund to exceed sixteen
percent of the total budgeted General Fund expenditures, excluding any
reappropriated amounts or encumbrances, for the current fiscal year, such
transfer shall be reduced so that the balance of the Cash Reserve Fund
does not exceed such amount.
(d) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the balance in the Cash
Reserve Fund from exceeding sixteen percent of the total budgeted General
Fund expenditures, excluding any reappropriated amounts or encumbrances,
each fiscal year if the Legislature determines it necessary to prepare
for and respond to budgetary requirements which may include, but are not
limited to, capital construction projects and responses to emergencies.
(3)(a) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
Tax Commissioner shall determine actual General Fund net receipts for the
most recently completed fiscal year minus estimated General Fund net
receipts for such fiscal year as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601
and 77-4603.
(b) If actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year exceed estimated General Fund net receipts for such
fiscal year, the Tax Commissioner shall certify the excess amount to the
State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer the excess amount to
the Cash Reserve Fund, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3)(c)
of this section.
(c) If actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
-3-

LB130 LB130
2025 2025
completed fiscal year exceed one hundred three percent of actual General
Fund net receipts for the previous fiscal year, the transfer described in
subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall be modified as follows:
(i) The amount transferred to the Cash Reserve Fund shall be reduced
by the excess amount calculated under subdivision (3)(c) of this section;
and
(ii) Such excess amount shall be transferred to the School District
Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-4602, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-